Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of ORS 291.055 (1)(e), the
following new or increased fees for providers of services to individuals with intellectual and
developmental disabilities, adopted by the Department of Human Services  and approved by
the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, are approved:
(1) Medicaid Agency
Certificate ................................. $ 500
(2) New Initial Application
Endorsements ........................... $ 100
(3) Renewal Application
Endorsements ........................... $ 50
(4) New Initial Application,
24-Hour Residential Setting
and Adult Foster Care
License...................................... $ 75
(5) Renewal Application, 24-Hour
Residential Setting and Adult
Foster Care License .................. $ 50
(6) 24-Hour Residential Setting
and Adult Foster Care License,
All Counties Other Than
Multnomah, Clackamas and
Washington ............................... $ 50
(7) Host Home License
Renewal Application.................. $ 50
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5527 (SB 5527-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 18, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5527 (SB 5527-A) Page 2